DIAGNOSTICS -

AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for2UZ -FE)

DI-65

DIAUU-01

DTC

P08 18 Driveline Disconnect Switch Input Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The Engine and ECT ECU detects the signal from the transfer neutral position switch.
This DTC indicates that the transfer neutral position switch remains ON.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
Transfer neutral position switch remains ON while vehicle run- ) " . N
. o . . . « Shortintransfer neutral position switch circuit
ningunder conditionsfor30sec. (2  -tripdetectionlogic) . .
P0818 . . « Transfer neutral position switch
*Vehicle speedis 25 km/h or more « Engine and ECTECU
« Transfer shift positionis H ginea
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DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for 2UZ-FE)

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check transfer neutral position switch.

PREPARATION:

Remove the transfer neutral position switch.

CHECK:

Check the continuity between the switch terminals when push-
ing the ball at the tip of the switch.

OK:

27+ 0.82mm

Switch Specified condition
OFF-ON
Push Continuity
D0266s Free No continuity

NG> Replace transfer neutral position switch.

2 [ Check harness and connector between Engine and ECT ECU and transfer neu-
tral position switch, transfer neutral position switch and body ground (See page
IN-38).

@

Check and replace the Engine and ECT
ECU(See page IN-38).

NG> Repair or replace the harness or connector.
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